New York, session 2025-2026, A6772.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1, paragraphs (c), (d) and (e) of subdivision 6 2 and subdivisions 10 and 13 of section 5-900 of the election law, as 3 amended by chapter 37 of the laws of 2021, are amended to read as 4 follows: 5 1. In addition to any other method of voter registration provided for 6 by this chapter, state and local agencies designated in subdivisions 7 thirteen and fourteen of this section shall provide to the state board 8 of elections voter registration qualification information associated 9 with each person who submits an application for services or assistance 10 at such agency, including a renewal, recertification, or reexamination 11 transaction at such agency, and each person who submits a change of 12 address or name form. [For the purposes of the department of motor vehi- 13 cles, "application for services or assistance at such agency" refers 14 only to an application for a motor vehicle driver's license, a driver's 15 license renewal or an identification card if such card is issued by the 16 department of motor vehicles in its normal course of business.] For 17 purposes of the New York city housing authority "application for 18 services or assistance at such agency" refers only to applications that EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00006-03-5 A. 6772--A 2 1 reach an eligibility interview and reexamination transactions. Such 2 designated agencies shall ensure agency applications substantially 3 include all of the elements required by section 5-210 of this article, 4 including the appropriate attestation, so that persons completing such 5 applications shall be able to also submit an application to register to 6 vote through the electronic voter registration transmittal system. For 7 purposes of this section, "agency" shall mean any state or local agency, 8 department, division, office, institution or other entity designated in 9 subdivision thirteen of this section or designated by the governor 10 pursuant to subdivision fourteen of this section. For purposes of this 11 section, registration shall also include pre-registration pursuant to 12 section 5-507 of this article. 13 (c) include a box for the applicant to check to indicate whether the 14 applicant would like to decline to register to vote along with the 15 following statement, or its substantial equivalent, in prominent type, 16 "IF YOU DO NOT CHECK THIS BOX, AND YOU PROVIDE YOUR SIGNATURE ON THE 17 SPACE BELOW, YOU WILL HAVE APPLIED TO REGISTER OR PRE-REGISTER TO VOTE, 18 AND YOU WILL HAVE ATTESTED TO YOUR ELIGIBILITY TO REGISTER OR PRE-REGIS- 19 TER TO VOTE." 20 (d) include the following warning statement, or its substantial equiv- 21 alent, in prominent type, "IF YOU ARE NOT A CITIZEN OF THE UNITED 22 STATES, YOU MUST CHECK THE BOX BELOW. NON-CITIZENS WHO REGISTER OR 23 PRE-REGISTER TO VOTE MAY BE SUBJECT TO CRIMINAL PENALTIES AND SUCH VOTER 24 REGISTRATION OR PRE-REGISTRATION MAY RESULT IN DEPORTATION OR REMOVAL, 25 EXCLUSION FROM ADMISSION TO THE UNITED STATES, OR DENIAL OF NATURALIZA- 26 TION."; 27 (e) include a space for the applicant to indicate the applicant's 28 choice of party enrollment, with a clear alternative provided for the 29 applicant to decline to affiliate with any party and the following 30 statement, or its substantial equivalent, in prominent type "ONLY 31 ENROLLED MEMBERS OF A POLITICAL PARTY MAY VOTE IN THAT PARTY'S PRIMA- 32 RIES". 33 10. A voter shall be able to decline to register to vote using an 34 integrated application by selecting a single check box, or equivalent, 35 which shall include the following statement, or its substantial equiv- 36 alent: "I DECLINE USE OF THIS FORM FOR VOTER REGISTRATION AND PRE-REGIS- 37 TRATION PURPOSES. DO NOT FORWARD MY INFORMATION TO THE BOARD OF 38 ELECTIONS." 39 13. [Beginning January first, two thousand twenty-three, designated 40 agencies for purposes of this section shall include the department of 41 motor vehicles.] Beginning January first, two thousand twenty-four, 42 designated agencies for the purposes of this section shall [also] 43 include the department of health, the office of temporary and disability 44 assistance, the department of labor, the office of adult career and 45 continuing education services - vocational rehabilitation, county and 46 city departments of social services, and the New York city housing 47 authority, as well as any other agency designated by the governor. 48 Provided that, any transactions with the department of health or county 49 and city departments of social services involving Medicaid enrollment 50 shall be processed pursuant to section 5-901-a of this title, in place 51 of this section. Provided further that, beginning January first, two 52 thousand twenty-eight, for applications that reach an eligibility inter- 53 view and reexamination transactions, the New York city housing authority 54 shall use the procedures required pursuant to section 5-901-b of this 55 title in place of the procedures required pursuant to this section. 56 Beginning January first, two thousand twenty-five, designated agencies A. 6772--A 3 1 for the purposes of this section shall also include the state university 2 of New York. Each designated agency shall enter into an agreement with 3 the state board of elections finalizing the format and content of elec- 4 tronic transmissions required by this section. The state board of 5 elections shall prepare and distribute to designated agencies written 6 instructions as to the implementation of the program and shall be 7 responsible for establishing training programs for employees of desig- 8 nated agencies listed in this section. Such instructions and such train- 9 ing shall ensure usability of the integrated application for low English 10 proficiency voters. Any such designated agency shall take all actions 11 that are necessary and proper for the implementation of this section, 12 including facilitating technological capabilities to allow transmission 13 of data through an interface with the electronic voter registration 14 transmittal system in a secure manner. 15 § 2. Subdivision 12 of section 5-900 of the election law, as amended 16 by chapter 37 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 17 12. No application for voter registration shall be submitted if the 18 applicant declines registration or fails to sign the integrated applica- 19 tion, whether on paper or online. Notwithstanding any other law to the 20 contrary, the department of motor vehicles shall not provide an opportu- 21 nity to register or pre-register to vote to, or transmit an application 22 for registration or pre-registration for, any person who, when conduct- 23 ing a department of motor vehicles transaction pursuant to subdivision 24 one of this section, provides documentation conclusively demonstrating 25 that such person is not a United States citizen. The department of motor 26 vehicles and the state board of elections shall jointly determine which 27 documents acceptable for transactions pursuant to subdivision one of 28 this section conclusively demonstrate that a person is not a United 29 States citizen. Provided further, that no agency designated under this 30 section shall provide an opportunity to register or pre-register to vote 31 to, or transmit an application for registration or pre-registration for, 32 any person who, by virtue of data received by the agency in the ordinary 33 course of its operations, is demonstrably ineligible to register or 34 pre-register to vote by reason of age or not being a citizen of the 35 United States. 36 § 3. The election law is amended by adding a new section 5-901 to read 37 as follows: 38 § 5-901. Procedures specific to the department of motor vehicles. 1. 39 Beginning January first, two thousand twenty-eight, the department of 40 motor vehicles shall utilize the automatic voter registration procedures 41 established by this section for each person who conducts any of the 42 following REAL ID or Enhanced license transactions: an application for 43 a motor vehicle driver's license or an identification card, or any 44 renewal, recertification, or reexamination transaction for such docu- 45 ments, or any change of address or name form for such documents. Prior 46 to January first, two thousand twenty-eight, the department of motor 47 vehicles shall utilize the procedures required under section 5-900 of 48 this title for such transactions. Beginning January first, two thousand 49 twenty-nine, the department of motor vehicles shall utilize the automat- 50 ic voter registration procedures established by this section for each 51 person who conducts any of the following standard license transactions: 52 an application for a motor vehicle driver's license or an identification 53 card, or any renewal, recertification, or reexamination transaction for 54 such documents, or any change of address or name form for such docu- 55 ments. Prior to January first, two thousand twenty-nine, the department A. 6772--A 4 1 of motor vehicles shall utilize the procedures required under section 2 5-900 of this title for such standard license transactions. 3 2. (a) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subdivision, where 4 a person conducts a department of motor vehicles transaction pursuant to 5 subdivision one of this section and such person has provided documenta- 6 tion to the department of motor vehicles conclusively demonstrating 7 United States citizenship and is of sufficient age to register or pre- 8 register to vote, the department of motor vehicles shall promptly trans- 9 mit electronically to the state board of elections the following infor- 10 mation regarding such person: 11 (i) such person's name; 12 (ii) such person's date of birth; 13 (iii) such person's driver's license or state ID number; 14 (iv) such person's residence address, and mailing address if different 15 from such residence address; 16 (v) such person's county of residence; 17 (vi) such person's citizenship status; 18 (vii) an electronic copy of such person's manual signature that is in 19 the custody of the department of motor vehicles; 20 (viii) the date of such person's transaction with the department of 21 motor vehicles; 22 (ix) such person's gender, if available; 23 (x) such person's telephone number, if available; 24 (xi) such person's e-mail address, if available; and 25 (xii) such person's choice of party enrollment, if affirmatively indi- 26 cated pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subdivision. 27 (b) The department of motor vehicles and the state board of elections 28 shall jointly determine which documents acceptable for transactions 29 pursuant to subdivision one of this section conclusively demonstrate 30 United States citizenship. For a person whose information is subject to 31 transmission pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision, the depart- 32 ment of motor vehicles shall provide an opportunity during the motor 33 vehicle transaction for an applicant to affirmatively indicate the 34 applicant's choice of party enrollment. Provided that, for an applicant 35 who is already registered to vote in New York state who does not affir- 36 matively indicate a choice of party enrollment pursuant to this para- 37 graph, such person's preexisting party affiliation status shall remain 38 unchanged as part of any registration update pursuant to subdivision 39 four of this section. 40 (c) The department of motor vehicles shall not transmit information 41 pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision for any person who is a 42 program participant in the address confidentiality program pursuant to 43 section one hundred eight of the executive law. 44 (d) Upon receiving information pursuant to paragraph (a) of this 45 subdivision for a person who is not registered to vote in New York state 46 and who is of sufficient age to register or pre-register to vote, unless 47 the state board of elections has evidence that such person is a program 48 participant in the address confidentiality program pursuant to section 49 one hundred eight of the executive law, the state board of elections 50 shall electronically forward such information to the board of elections 51 of the county or the city of the person's residence address for regis- 52 tration or pre-registration consistent with this chapter. 53 (e) (i) Upon receiving information pursuant to paragraph (d) of this 54 subdivision, a county or city board of elections shall register or pre- 55 register the person to vote pursuant to section 5-210 of this article 56 effective as of the date of such person's transaction with the depart- A. 6772--A 5 1 ment of motor vehicles. The county or city board of elections shall 2 promptly send to such person's mailing address, by non-forwardable mail, 3 a notice that such person has been registered to vote, or pre-registered 4 to vote, if applicable, that contains a postage paid preaddressed return 5 form by which such person may decline to be registered or pre-regis- 6 tered. Such notice shall be combined with the notice required pursuant 7 to subdivision one of section 5-308 of this article and, if the person 8 has not indicated a choice of party enrollment pursuant to subparagraph 9 (xii) of paragraph (a) of this subdivision, shall also offer such person 10 the opportunity to enroll with a party. Such notice shall also include a 11 statement that, if such person declines to register or pre-register to 12 vote, the fact that such person has declined registration or pre-regis- 13 tration will remain confidential and will be used only for election 14 administration purposes, and a statement that, if such person does not 15 decline registration or pre-registration, the office at which such 16 person was registered or pre-registered will remain confidential and 17 will be used only for election administration purposes. Such notice 18 shall also provide information and procedures for anyone wishing to 19 prevent disclosure of their residence address, including information 20 regarding the address confidentiality program for victims of domestic 21 violence under section 5-508 of this article. The notice required by 22 this subparagraph may be combined with the notice provided to newly 23 registered voters pursuant to subdivision nine of section 5-210 of this 24 article. 25 (ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a person of 26 sufficient age to register to vote whose information is transmitted to a 27 county or city board pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph 28 shall be registered to vote for an election if the date of such person's 29 transaction with the department of motor vehicles pursuant to subdivi- 30 sion one of this section occurs by the twelfth day before such election 31 and such person's information is transmitted to the county or city board 32 by the tenth day before such election. A person whose transaction with 33 the department of motor vehicles occurs within thirty days of an 34 election shall be required to affirm before voting that such person has 35 resided in such person's county, city, or village for at least thirty 36 days before such election. Such affirmation shall be available at the 37 time of voting and at the time of requesting an early mail or absentee 38 ballot. A voter who signs an affirmation pursuant to this subparagraph 39 shall not be challenged or required to vote an affidavit ballot on the 40 grounds that such voter signed such affirmation. 41 (f) (i) If a person returns the notice provided under subparagraph (i) 42 of paragraph (e) of this subdivision and declines to be registered or 43 pre-registered to vote, such person's registration or pre-registration 44 shall be canceled, and such person shall be deemed to have not regis- 45 tered or pre-registered. However, if such person has voted in an 46 election after the transmission of such person's information but before 47 the notice is returned, the returned form shall be of no effect and such 48 person shall remain registered as of the date of such person's trans- 49 action with the department of motor vehicles. Information relating to 50 the return of a notice form declining to be registered or pre-registered 51 shall not be used for any purpose other than election administration. 52 (ii) Notwithstanding subdivision three of section 5-304 of this arti- 53 cle, if a person returns the notice provided under subparagraph (i) of 54 paragraph (e) of this subdivision and elects to enroll in a party, such 55 enrollment shall take effect immediately. However, any pre-registrant's A. 6772--A 6 1 registration shall remain classified as "pending" until the voter 2 reaches the age of eligibility. 3 (iii) If a person returns the notice provided under subparagraph (i) 4 of paragraph (e) of this subdivision but does not select any options, 5 the returned notice shall be of no force and effect, and such person 6 shall remain registered to vote, or pre-registered to vote, if applica- 7 ble. 8 3. (a) The department of motor vehicles shall not provide an opportu- 9 nity to register or pre-register to vote or transmit any information to 10 the board of elections for purposes of voter registration for any person 11 who, when conducting a department of motor vehicles transaction pursuant 12 to subdivision one of this section, provides documentation conclusively 13 demonstrating that such person is not a United States citizen. The 14 department of motor vehicles and the state board of elections shall 15 jointly determine which documents acceptable for transactions pursuant 16 to subdivision one of this section conclusively demonstrate that a 17 person is not a United States citizen. 18 (b) For any person who conducts a department of motor vehicles trans- 19 action pursuant to subdivision one of this section whose information is 20 not already subject to transmission to the state board of elections 21 pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision two of this section and who 22 does not provide documentation at the time of such person's transaction 23 conclusively demonstrating that such person is not a United States citi- 24 zen, the department of motor vehicles transaction shall provide an inte- 25 grated voter registration opportunity as part of such transaction. For 26 purposes of this paragraph, registration shall also include pre-regis- 27 tration pursuant to section 5-507 of this article. 28 (c) The department shall ensure agency applications pursuant to para- 29 graph (b) of this subdivision include all of the elements required by 30 section 5-210 of this article, including the appropriate attestation, so 31 that persons completing such applications shall be able to also submit 32 an application to register to vote through the electronic voter regis- 33 tration transmittal system. 34 (d) The integrated voter registration opportunity shall: 35 (i) include a statement of the eligibility requirements for voter 36 registration and shall require an applicant to attest that such appli- 37 cant meets such requirements under penalty of perjury; 38 (ii) inform an applicant, in print identical to that used in the 39 attestation section, of the following: 40 (A) voter eligibility requirements; 41 (B) penalties for submission of a false registration application; 42 (C) that the office where such applicant applies for registration 43 shall remain confidential and the voter registration information shall 44 be used only for voter registration purposes; 45 (D) that if such applicant applies to register to vote electronically, 46 such applicant thereby consents to the use of an electronic copy of such 47 applicant's manual signature that is in the custody of the department of 48 motor vehicles, as such applicant's voter registration exemplar signa- 49 ture; 50 (E) if such applicant signs the application and affirmatively selects 51 the voter registration option, such applicant thereby consents to the 52 use of any information required to complete the voter registration 53 application; and 54 (F) if such applicant declines to register, such applicant's declina- 55 tion shall remain confidential and be used only for voter registration 56 purposes; A. 6772--A 7 1 (iii) require an applicant who attests to the eligibility requirements 2 for voter registration to either affirmatively select or affirmatively 3 decline voter registration as a necessary condition to complete the 4 application pursuant to subdivision one of this section; 5 (iv) include the following warning statement, or its substantial 6 equivalent, in prominent type, "IF YOU ARE NOT A CITIZEN OF THE UNITED 7 STATES, DO NOT SELECT THE OPTION TO REGISTER TO VOTE. NON-CITIZENS WHO 8 REGISTER OR PRE-REGISTER TO VOTE MAY BE SUBJECT TO CRIMINAL PENALTIES 9 AND SUCH VOTER REGISTRATION OR PRE-REGISTRATION MAY RESULT IN DEPORTA- 10 TION OR REMOVAL, EXCLUSION FROM ADMISSION TO THE UNITED STATES, OR 11 DENIAL OF NATURALIZATION."; 12 (v) include a space for an applicant to indicate such applicant's 13 choice of party enrollment, with a clear alternative provided for such 14 applicant to decline to affiliate with any party and the following 15 statement, or its substantial equivalent, in prominent type "ONLY 16 ENROLLED MEMBERS OF A POLITICAL PARTY MAY VOTE IN THAT PARTY'S PRIMA- 17 RIES."; and 18 (vi) include a statement that if an applicant is a victim of domestic 19 violence or stalking, such applicant may contact the state board of 20 elections before or after registering or pre-registering to vote in 21 order to receive information regarding the address confidentiality 22 program for victims of domestic violence under section 5-508 of this 23 article. 24 (e) For each person who completes an application to register to vote 25 pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subdivision, who attests to the eligi- 26 bility requirements for voter registration, and affirmatively selects 27 voter registration pursuant to subparagraph (iii) of paragraph (d) of 28 this subdivision, the department of motor vehicles shall electronically 29 transmit to the state board of elections through an interface with the 30 electronic voter registration transmittal system established and main- 31 tained by the state board of elections such portion of the application 32 that includes voter registration information. If such person is not 33 already registered to vote in New York state, the state board of 34 elections shall electronically forward such application to the applica- 35 ble board of elections of each county or the city of New York for regis- 36 tration consistent with this chapter. The department shall not transmit 37 to the state board of elections an application for registration for a 38 person who indicates on the integrated personal voter registration 39 application that such person does not meet the eligibility requirements 40 for registration. 41 (f) An integrated voter registration application submitted to the 42 department of motor vehicles in an electronic format shall be transmit- 43 ted to the state board of elections through the electronic voter regis- 44 tration transmittal system and shall include all of the voter registra- 45 tion data elements, including electronic signature, as applicable, and 46 record of attestation of the accuracy of the voter registration informa- 47 tion and any relevant document images. 48 (g) An integrated voter registration form submitted to the department 49 of motor vehicles in paper format shall be transmitted to the state 50 board of elections through the electronic voter registration transmittal 51 system by converting the paper form to an image file or a portable docu- 52 ment format file which shall thereafter be deemed the original form for 53 voter registration and enrollment purposes. The department shall retain 54 the complete original paper application for no less than two years. The 55 transmittal of the converted paper application may include or be accom- A. 6772--A 8 1 panied by data elements and transmittal information as required by the 2 rules and regulations of the state board of elections. 3 (h) The department shall redact or remove from the completed inte- 4 grated application to be transmitted to the state board of elections any 5 information solely applicable to the agency application. 6 (i) Information from an applicant relevant to both voter registration 7 and the department application shall be entered by the applicant only 8 once upon an electronic application. 9 (j) Information concerning the citizenship status of individuals, when 10 collected and transmitted pursuant to this subdivision, shall not be 11 retained, used, or shared for any other purpose except as may be 12 required by law. 13 (k) For each person who attests to the eligibility requirements for 14 voter registration, but who does not affirmatively select voter regis- 15 tration pursuant to subparagraph (iii) of paragraph (d) of this subdivi- 16 sion, the department of motor vehicles shall electronically transmit to 17 the state board of elections through an interface with the electronic 18 voter registration transmittal system established and maintained by the 19 state board of elections such portion of the application that includes 20 voter registration information with a clear designation that such infor- 21 mation shall be used only for the purpose of updating existing registra- 22 tion records. 23 4. (a) If information is received by the state board of elections from 24 the department of motor vehicles pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivi- 25 sion two or paragraph (e) or (k) of subdivision three of this section 26 for a person who is already registered or pre-registered to vote in New 27 York state, the state board of elections shall determine whether the 28 information provided to the department of motor vehicles indicates a 29 different name, residence address, or mailing address from that on such 30 person's registration record. 31 (b) If information provided to the department of motor vehicles pursu- 32 ant to paragraph (a) of subdivision two or paragraph (e) or (k) of 33 subdivision three of this section indicates a different name, residence 34 address, or mailing address for a registered or pre-registered voter 35 from that on such person's registration record, the state board of 36 elections shall electronically transmit the updated name or address for 37 such person to the appropriate board of elections for such person's 38 residence. If such person has changed residence from one county to 39 another, the state board of elections shall electronically transmit such 40 information to both the board of the previous county or city of resi- 41 dence and the new county or city of residence. The board of elections in 42 such person's county or city of residence shall use the information 43 transmitted by the board to update such person's existing voter regis- 44 tration record, transfer the person's registration, if inactive, to 45 active status, and send to such person's address of record the notice 46 required under subdivision five of section 5-208 of this article. The 47 board of elections in any previous county or city of residence shall 48 update such person's voter registration record to reflect that such 49 person has moved to a different county. 50 (c) If a person returns the notice required under paragraph (b) of 51 this subdivision and indicates that the change to such person's regis- 52 tration record was in error, the appropriate boards of elections, 53 including the board of the previous county or city of residence, shall 54 promptly correct such person's previously updated information in the 55 statewide voter registration list. A. 6772--A 9 1 (d) Any application pursuant to subdivision one of this section shall 2 inform the applicant that if such applicant is already registered or 3 pre-registered to vote in New York state, the name, residence address, 4 and mailing address provided on the application shall be used to update 5 such person's registration record and that such person shall receive 6 notice of any update by mail, along with information on how to correct 7 such update, if needed. 8 5. The state board of elections shall prepare and distribute to the 9 department of motor vehicles written instructions as to the implementa- 10 tion of this section and shall be responsible for establishing training 11 programs for employees of the department of motor vehicles. Such 12 instructions and such training shall ensure usability of the integrated 13 application in subdivision three of this section for low-English profi- 14 ciency voters. The department of motor vehicles shall take all actions 15 that are necessary and proper for the implementation of this section, 16 including facilitating technological capabilities to allow transmission 17 of data through an interface with the electronic voter registration 18 transmittal system in a secure manner. 19 6. Subject to compliance with applicable federal and state laws, for a 20 person who applies for an identification card or motor vehicle driver's 21 license as part of such person's release from incarceration, who is of 22 sufficient age to register or pre-register to vote, and who identified a 23 place of residence within the state where the person will reside follow- 24 ing the person's release from incarceration as part of such application, 25 the department of motor vehicles, the department of corrections and 26 community supervision, and the state board of elections shall coordinate 27 to ensure that such a person is provided the voter registration opportu- 28 nities required by this section as part of such application. Provided 29 that, an incarcerated person convicted of a felony who is otherwise 30 eligible to register to vote shall not be registered to vote pursuant to 31 this section until the person is released from incarceration and 32 restored to eligibility, and the department of motor vehicles, the 33 department of corrections and community supervision, and the state board 34 of elections shall coordinate to ensure that any registration informa- 35 tion provided pursuant to this section is processed only upon the 36 person's release from incarceration. The department of motor vehicles 37 and the state board of elections shall modify the procedures and notices 38 required by this section to reflect that a person convicted of a felony 39 will not be registered to vote until the person's release from incarcer- 40 ation and to allow a person provided a registration opportunity pursuant 41 to subsection three of this section to attest to their eligibility pend- 42 ing release from incarceration. 43 7. The state board of elections may promulgate rules and regulations 44 for the administration of this section. 45 8. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require documentary 46 proof of citizenship for voter registration. Nothing in this section 47 shall be construed to authorize or require the department of motor vehi- 48 cles to request documentation establishing an applicant's citizenship 49 solely for the purposes of voter registration. 50 9. The state board of elections shall publicly release data reports, 51 as described in this subdivision, on a monthly basis. Such data reports 52 shall not include any personally identifying information, shall be 53 subcategorized by gender and age of the individuals included, and shall 54 include all of the following information: 55 (a) The number of individuals registered to vote or pre-registered to 56 vote under the procedures in subdivision two of this section. A. 6772--A 10 1 (b) The number of individuals registered to vote or pre-registered to 2 vote under the procedures in subdivision three of this section. 3 (c) The number of individuals who declined voter registration or pre- 4 registration under the procedures in subdivision two of this section. 5 (d) The number of individuals who declined voter registration or pre- 6 registration under the procedures in subdivision three of this section. 7 (e) The number of individuals whose voter registration or pre-regis- 8 tration was updated pursuant to the procedures in subdivision four of 9 this section. 10 § 4. The election law is amended by adding a new section 5-901-a to 11 read as follows: 12 § 5-901-a. Procedures specific to Medicaid enrollment. 1. Subject to 13 any modifications necessary to comply with applicable federal laws and 14 regulations including such modifications under subdivision two of this 15 section, beginning January first, two thousand twenty-eight, the depart- 16 ment of health and county and city departments of social services shall 17 automatically and electronically transmit the following information to 18 the state board of elections for purposes of voter registration and 19 pre-registration for each person who applies for or re-enrolls in Medi- 20 caid, who is of sufficient age to register or pre-register to vote, and 21 who is externally verified as a United States citizen as part of an 22 application for Medicaid: 23 (a) such person's name; 24 (b) such person's date of birth; 25 (c) the last four digits of such person's social security number; 26 (d) such person's residence address, and mailing address if different 27 from the residence address; 28 (e) such person's county of residence; 29 (f) such person's citizenship status; 30 (g) an electronic copy of such person's manual signature, if avail- 31 able; 32 (h) the date of such person's application or reenrollment transaction; 33 (i) such person's gender, if available; 34 (j) such person's telephone number, if available; 35 (k) such person's e-mail address, if available; and 36 (l) such person's choice of party enrollment, if indicated pursuant to 37 subdivision two of this section. 38 2. A person whose information is subject to transmission pursuant to 39 subdivision one of this section shall be provided an opportunity to 40 affirmatively indicate a choice of party enrollment prior to trans- 41 mission of the person's information to the state board of elections. 42 Provided that, for an applicant who is already registered to vote in New 43 York state who does not affirmatively indicate a party enrollment 44 selection pursuant to this subdivision, such person's preexisting party 45 affiliation status shall remain unchanged as part of any update to the 46 person's registration pursuant to this section. 47 3. If necessary to comply with federal law, before transmitting a 48 person's information to the state board of elections for purposes of 49 voter registration pursuant to subdivision one of this section, the 50 department of health and county and city departments of social services 51 or their designees shall, within fifteen days of such person's applica- 52 tion or re-enrollment transaction, notify by mail such person whose data 53 is subject to transmission pursuant to subdivision one of this section 54 and provide such person an opportunity to decline transmission. Such 55 notice shall be sent to such person's mailing address by non-forwardable 56 mail, notify such person that such person's information will be shared A. 6772--A 11 1 with election officials for purposes of keeping voter registration 2 records complete and accurate, and contain a postage paid preaddressed 3 return form by which such person may decline transmission of such 4 person's data to the state board of elections. If such person returns 5 such notice within seventeen days of mailing and declines transmission 6 of such person's information, such person's information shall not be 7 transmitted to the state board of elections for purposes of voter regis- 8 tration. If such person does not return the notice provided under this 9 subdivision and declines transmission of such person's information with- 10 in seventeen days of mailing, such person's information shall be trans- 11 mitted to the state board of elections within three days for purposes of 12 voter registration. 13 4. In processing information received the department of health and 14 county and city departments of social services pursuant to subdivision 15 one of this section, the state board of elections and boards of 16 elections for each county or the city of New York shall comply with the 17 requirements established in subdivisions two and four of section 5-901 18 of this title. Provided that, a person of sufficient age to register to 19 vote whose information is transmitted to a county or city board pursuant 20 to this section shall be registered to vote for an election if the 21 information is transmitted to the county or city board by the tenth day 22 before such election. 23 5. Prior to January first, two thousand twenty-eight, the department 24 of health and county and city departments of social services shall 25 utilize the procedures required under section 5-900 of this title for 26 Medicaid enrollment transactions. 27 § 5. The election law is amended by adding a new section 5-901-b to 28 read as follows: 29 § 5-901-b. Procedures specific to New York city housing authority 30 applications. 1. Subject to any modifications necessary to comply with 31 applicable federal laws and regulations including such modifications 32 under subdivision two of this section, beginning January first, two 33 thousand twenty-eight, the New York city housing authority shall auto- 34 matically and electronically transmit the following to the state board 35 of elections for purposes of voter registration and pre-registration for 36 each person who files an application that reaches an eligibility inter- 37 view or conducts a reexamination transaction, who is of sufficient age 38 to register or pre-register to vote, who is a resident of the state, and 39 who is externally verified as a United States citizen as part of such 40 application or transaction: 41 (a) such person's name; 42 (b) such person's date of birth; 43 (c) the last four digits of such person's social security number; 44 (d) such person's residence address, and mailing address if different 45 from the residence address; 46 (e) such person's county of residence; 47 (f) such person's citizenship status; 48 (g) an electronic copy of such person's manual signature, if avail- 49 able; 50 (h) the date of such person's application or re-examination trans- 51 action; 52 (i) such person's gender, if available; 53 (j) such person's telephone number, if available; and 54 (k) such person's email address, if available. 55 2. If necessary to comply with federal law, before transmitting a 56 person's information to the state board of elections for purposes of A. 6772--A 12 1 voter registration pursuant to subdivision one of this section, the New 2 York city housing authority or its designee shall, within fifteen days 3 of such person's eligibility interview or reexamination transaction, 4 notify by mail such person whose data is subject to transmission pursu- 5 ant to subdivision one of this section and provide such person an oppor- 6 tunity to decline transmission. Such notice shall be sent to such 7 person's mailing address by non-forwardable mail, notify such person 8 that such person's information will be shared with election officials 9 for purposes of keeping voter registration records complete and accu- 10 rate, and contain a postage paid preaddressed return form by which such 11 person may decline transmission of such person's data to the state board 12 of elections. If such person returns such notice within seventeen days 13 of mailing and declines transmission of such person's information, such 14 person's information shall not be transmitted to the state board of 15 elections for purposes of voter registration. If such person does not 16 return the notice provided under this subdivision and declines trans- 17 mission of such person's information within seventeen days of mailing, 18 such person's information shall be transmitted to the state board of 19 elections within three days for purposes of voter registration. 20 3. In processing information received by the New York city housing 21 authority pursuant to subdivision one of this section, the state board 22 of elections and boards of elections for each county or the city of New 23 York shall comply with the requirements established in subdivisions two 24 and four of section 5-901 of this title. Provided that, a person of 25 sufficient age to register to vote whose information is transmitted to a 26 county or city board pursuant to this section shall be registered to 27 vote for an election if the information is transmitted to the county or 28 city board by the tenth day before such election. 29 4. Prior to January first, two thousand twenty-eight, the New York 30 city housing authority shall utilize the procedures required under 31 section 5-900 of this title for New York city housing authority applica- 32 tions that reach an eligibility interview and reexamination trans- 33 actions. 34 § 6. Section 5-902 of the election law, as amended by chapter 37 of 35 the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 36 § 5-902. Failure to receive exemplar signature not to prevent regis- 37 tration. If a voter registration exemplar signature is not received from 38 an applicant who submits a voter registration or pre-registration appli- 39 cation or is otherwise registered or pre-registered to vote pursuant to 40 this title and such signature exemplar is not otherwise available from 41 the statewide voter registration database or a state or local agency, 42 the local board of elections shall, absent another reason to reject the 43 application, proceed to register or pre-register and, as applicable, 44 enroll the applicant. Within ten days of such action, the board of 45 elections shall send a standard form promulgated by the state board of 46 elections to the voter whose record lacks an exemplar signature, requir- 47 ing such voter to submit a signature for identification purposes. The 48 voter shall submit to the board of elections a voter registration exemp- 49 lar signature by any one of the following methods: in person, by mail 50 with return postage paid provided by the board of elections, by elec- 51 tronic mail, or by electronic upload to the board of elections through 52 the electronic voter registration transmittal system. If such voter does 53 not provide the required exemplar signature, when the voter appears to 54 vote the voter shall be entitled to vote by affidavit ballot. A. 6772--A 13 1 § 7. The opening paragraphs of subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 5-904 2 of the election law, as amended by chapter 37 of the laws of 2021, are 3 amended to read as follows: 4 Notwithstanding subdivision six of section 5-210 of this article or 5 any other law to the contrary, a person who is ineligible to vote who 6 fails to decline to register or pre-register to vote in accordance with 7 the provisions of this [section] title or who is otherwise registered or 8 pre-registered to vote in accordance with the provisions of this title, 9 and who did not willfully and knowingly seek to register or pre-register 10 to vote knowing that the person is not eligible to do so: 11 Notwithstanding subdivision six of section 5-210 of this article or 12 any other law to the contrary, a person who is ineligible to vote who 13 fails to decline to register or pre-register to vote in accordance with 14 the provisions of this [section] title or who is otherwise registered or 15 pre-registered to vote in accordance with the provisions of this title, 16 and who then either votes or attempts to vote in an election held after 17 the effective date of that person's registration, and who did not will- 18 fully and knowingly seek to register or pre-register to vote knowing 19 that the person is not eligible to do so, and did not subsequently vote 20 or attempt to vote knowing that the person is not eligible to do so: 21 § 8. Subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 5-308 of the election law, as 22 amended by chapter 37 of the laws of 2021, are amended to read as 23 follows: 24 1. The board of elections shall, promptly and not later than twenty- 25 one days after receipt of a voter registration or pre-registration 26 application submitted pursuant to title nine of this article by a voter 27 registering or pre-registering for the first time, send any such voter 28 who did not enroll in a party a notice and a form to indicate party 29 enrollment. Such notice shall offer the voter the opportunity to enroll 30 with a party or to decline to enroll with a party and contain the 31 following statement in prominent type "ONLY ENROLLED MEMBERS OF A POLI- 32 TICAL PARTY MAY VOTE IN THAT PARTY'S PRIMARIES." Such form shall provide 33 a clear alternative for the applicant to decline to affiliate with any 34 party. If the board of elections has not received a response to the 35 party enrollment notice and form sent pursuant to this subdivision, or 36 to a party enrollment notice sent pursuant to subparagraph (i) of para- 37 graph (e) of subdivision two of section 5-901 of this article within 38 forty-five days of a person's registration, the board shall mail a 39 second party enrollment notice and form to such person. 40 2. Notwithstanding subdivision [two] three of section 5-304 of this 41 title, if a voter who registered to vote for the first time (or pre-re- 42 gistered) pursuant to title nine of this article responds to either of 43 the [notice] notices required by subdivision one of this section and 44 elects to enroll in a party, such enrollment shall take effect imme- 45 diately. However, any pre-registrant's registration shall remain classi- 46 fied as "pending" until the voter reaches the age of eligibility. 47 § 9. This act shall take effect January 1, 2028; provided, however, 48 the amendments to subdivision 12 of section 5-900 of the election law, 49 made by section two of this act, shall take effect immediately.